Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1203
Due process required; when.

Every stage and facet of all proceedings of a collegiate athletic association, college, or university that may result in the imposition of a penalty for violation of such association's rule or legislation shall comply with due process of law as guaranteed by the Constitution of Nebraska and the laws of Nebraska.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 3.